Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.570 and 2025 c 343 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a license for sports entertainment facilities to be designated as a sports entertainment facility license to sell beer, wine, and spirits at retail, for consumption upon the premises only, the license to be issued to the entity providing food and beverage service at a sports entertainment facility as defined in this section. The cost of the license is $3,750 per annum.(2)(a) For purposes of this section, a sports entertainment facility includes a publicly or privately owned arena, coliseum, stadium, ((or)) facility where sporting events are presented for a price of admission, or a facility described in (b) of this subsection. The facility does not have to be exclusively used for sporting events.(b) A sports entertainment facility also includes a publicly or privately owned facility where sports, amusement, or recreational activity is engaged in by patrons for a price to enter the facility's premises or participate in the activity. The licensed premises of the facility may be indoor, outdoor, or a combination of indoor and outdoor areas. The facility does not have to be exclusively used for sports, amusement, or recreational activities.(3) The board may impose reasonable requirements upon a licensee under this section, such as requirements for the availability of food and victuals including but not limited to hamburgers, sandwiches, salads, or other snack food. The board may also restrict the type of events, and the type of sports, amusement, or recreational activities that may be available for patrons to engage in, at a sports entertainment facility at which beer, wine, and spirits may be served. When imposing conditions for a licensee, the board must consider the seating accommodations, eating facilities, and circulation patterns in such a facility, and other amenities available at a sports entertainment facility. When imposing conditions for a license for a facility described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the board must also consider the type of sports, amusement, or recreational activities available to patrons and the layout and nature of the facility's premises.(4)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to the license under this section to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is $525.(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(5) The board may issue an endorsement to the beer, wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility license that allows the holder of a beer, wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is $180.(6)(a) A licensee and an affiliated business may enter into arrangements with a manufacturer, importer, or distributor for brand advertising at the sports entertainment facility or promotion of events held at the sports entertainment facility, with a capacity of five thousand people or more. The financial arrangements providing for the brand advertising or promotion of events shall not be used as an inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or distributor entering into the arrangement nor shall it result in the exclusion of brands or products of other companies.(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (6) are an exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The board shall monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The board may conduct audits of the licensee and the affiliated business to determine compliance with this subsection (6). Audits may include but are not limited to product selection at the facility; purchase patterns of the licensee; contracts with the liquor manufacturer, importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or used for liquor advertising by the licensee, affiliated business, manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.(c) The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 30, 2008, and biennially thereafter, on the impacts of arrangements allowed between sports entertainment licensees and liquor manufacturers, importers, and distributors for brand advertising and promotion of events at the facility.--- END ---